Tennessee statutes. Title 23 Attorneys-at-law
Chapter 1

Qualification and Admission to Practice

23-1-101. Board of law examiners.

A state board of law examiners is created, to consist of not more than five (5) members of the state bar, who shall be appointed from time to time by the supreme court, and shall hold office.

The compensation of each member of the board shall be fixed by the administrative director of the courts, with the approval of the chief justice of the supreme court, and shall include travel expenses.

All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be pursuant to policies and guidelines promulgated by the supreme court.

From the receipts from fees, the board shall pay its compensation and expenses, and any excess of receipts over disbursements shall be paid over to the state treasurer for the use of the state; it being the purpose that the board and its administration shall not be a charge upon, or an expense to the state, that compensation and expenses shall come only from the board's income, and that any excess of income over compensation and expenses shall go into the state treasury.

Acts 1903, ch. 247, §§ 2, 3; Shan., §§ 5777a2, 5777a3; Acts 1919, ch. 154, § 1; mod. Code 1932, §§ 7113, 7113a; Acts 1963, ch. 285, § 1; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(138); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 29-101; Acts 1982, ch. 743, § 1; 1987, ch. 51, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, § 43; 1993, ch. 196, § 9; 1997, ch. 429, § 1; 2001, ch. 146, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 47; 2016, ch. 797, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. The board of law examiners, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2028. See §§4-29-112,4-29-249.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “the civil justice and finance, ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the judiciary and finance, ways and means committees of the senate” for “the judiciary committees and the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and the house of representatives” in the last sentence of (b)(1).

The 2016 amendment deleted the former second sentence of (b)(1) which read: “The administrative director of the courts shall notify the chairs of the civil justice and finance, ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the judiciary and finance, ways and means committees of the senate each time the compensation of any member of the board is increased.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 236, § 94. April 19, 2013.

Acts 2016, ch. 797, § 19. April 14, 2016.

Cross-References. Legal insurance, title 56, ch. 43.

Licensing of attorneys, Tenn. R. Sup. Ct. 7.

Maximum age limit appointments to state boards and commissions, §4-1-403.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney and Client, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Attorney v. Client — Privity, Malpractice, and the Lack of Respect for the Primacy of the Attorney-Client Relationship in Estate Planning, 68 Tenn. L. Rev. 261 (2001).

Equal Numbers Don't Add Up to Equal Opportunities for Many Women Lawyers, ABA Report Finds, 37 No. 7 Tenn. B.J. 17 (2001).

Essay: A Brief History of the Tennessee Board of Law Examiners and the Standards for Bar Admissions in Tennessee (Lewis R. Hagood), 71 Tenn. L. Rev. 571 (2004).

Regulation of the Bar in Tennessee (Walter P. Armstrong, Jr.), 53 Tenn. L. Rev. 723 (1986).

50 Years of Pioneers: Early Women in Tennessee Law (Suzanne Craig Robertson), 37 No. 7 Tenn. B.J. 14 (2001).

Attorney General Opinions. Even though administrative law judges have already limited nonlawyer corporate representatives to giving an oral statement on the record, the nonlawyer representative of a corporation should exercise caution when providing an oral statement as this practice would appear to present the potential for the unauthorized practice of law that could only be resolved on a case-by-case basis, OAG 04-160 (11/10/04).

A nonlawyer corporate agent cannot initiate a contested case hearing by filing an initial pleading as this action would be in a “representative capacity,” would constitute the “practice of law” under this section and T.C.A. §23-3-103, and would be considered the unauthorized practice of law if any aspect of the undertaking or conduct requires the “professional judgment of a lawyer,” OAG 04-160 (11/10/04).

Comparative Legislation. Qualification and admission to practice:

Ala. Code §34-3-1 et seq.

Ark. Code §16-22-201 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §15-19-1 et seq.

Ky. S.C.R. 2 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §§73-3-2,73-3-25.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 484.020 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 84-1 — 84-10.

Va. Code § 54.1-3925 et seq.

Cited: Lineberger v. State, 174 Tenn. 538, 129 S.W.2d 198, 1938 Tenn. LEXIS 118 (1939); Cantor v. Brading, 494 S.W.2d 139, 1973 Tenn. App. LEXIS 250 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1973); Hampton v. Tennessee Bd. of Law Examiners, 770 S.W.2d 755, 1988 Tenn. App. LEXIS 739 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1988).

23-1-102. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §23-1-102 (Code 1858, § 3966 (deriv. Acts 1809 (Sept.), ch. 6, § 2); Shan., § 5776; mod. Code 1932, § 9972; Acts 1972, ch. 612, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 29-102), concerning the certificate of the county court, was repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 238, § 1. For present provisions, see §23-1-104.

23-1-103. Examination of applicants.

There shall be an examination of persons applying for a license to practice as attorneys and counselors at law at the cities of Knoxville, Nashville, and Memphis, respectively, and at such other places and times as the supreme court may direct. The supreme court shall prescribe rules to regulate the admission of persons to practice law and provide for a uniform system of examinations that will govern and control admission to practice law and to regulate the board in the performance of its duties.

Acts 1903, ch. 247, § 3; 1903, ch. 465; Shan., § 5777a3; Acts 1919, ch. 154, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 7113a; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 29-103.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney and Client, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Legal Education in Tennessee (Panel: William Wicker, John W. Wade), 29 Tenn. L. Rev. 325.

Cited: Cantor v. Brading, 494 S.W.2d 139, 1973 Tenn. App. LEXIS 250 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1973); Stanfield v. Horn, 704 F. Supp. 1487, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 15945 (M.D. Tenn. 1988).

23-1-104. Certification and admission of successful applicants.

The board of law examiners shall certify to the supreme court the names of all applicants who have passed the required examination and who are determined by the board to be of full age and of such reputation and character as to be likely to contribute to upholding the high standards of the legal profession.

Upon certification, if the supreme court finds that the person is of full age and good moral character and otherwise qualified, it shall enter an order licensing and admitting the person to practice as an attorney, solicitor and counselor in all the courts of the state, which license, if procured by fraud, may be revoked at any time within two (2) years.

Acts 1903, ch. 247, § 5; Shan., § 5777a5; mod. Code 1932, § 7115; Acts 1963, ch. 285, § 1; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 29-104.

Cross-References. Admission of attorneys, Tenn. R. Sup. Ct. 6.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney and Client, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Sherman Antitrust Act — State Action Immunity — Bar Examiners' Liability, 52 Tenn. L. Rev. 525 (1985).

Cited: Stanfield v. Horn, 704 F. Supp. 1487, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 15945 (M.D. Tenn. 1988).

23-1-105. Admission on foreign license.

The supreme court may make provisions, rules and regulations it deems proper for the admission of persons who have been licensed to practice law in other states or countries.

Acts 1903, ch. 247, § 6; Shan., § 5777a6; mod. Code 1932, § 7116; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 29-105.

Cross-References. Nonresident attorneys, Tenn. R. Sup. Ct. 6, 7.

Cited: State Board of Law Examiners v. Shimer, 131 Tenn. 343, 174 S.W. 1142, 1914 Tenn. LEXIS 111 (1915); Cantor v. Brading, 494 S.W.2d 139, 1973 Tenn. App. LEXIS 250 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1973).

Collateral References. 7 Am. Jur. 2d Attorneys at Law §§ 9, 10.

7 C.J.S. Attorney and Client §§ 3, 15.

Attorney's right to appear pro hac vice in state court. 20 A.L.R.4th 855.

Attorney and client
2.

23-1-106. Fees — Accounting.

Every person, at the time of applying for examination, shall pay a fee as specified by the rules of the supreme court, and the supreme court is authorized to delegate the fixing of the fees to the board of law examiners. The board shall render to the secretary of state an annual account of receipts and disbursements on December 31 of each year.

Acts 1903, ch. 247, § 4; Shan., § 5777a4; Acts 1919, ch. 154, § 2; mod. Code 1932, § 7114; Acts 1963, ch. 285, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed), § 29-106.

Cross-References. Occupation tax on attorneys, title 67, ch. 4, part 17.

Cited: Lineberger v. State, 174 Tenn. 538, 129 S.W.2d 198, 1938 Tenn. LEXIS 118 (1939).

Collateral References. Attorney and client
6.

23-1-107. Women admitted to practice.

Any women eighteen (18) years of age or older and otherwise possessing the necessary qualifications, may be granted a license to practice law in the courts of this state.

Acts 1907, ch. 69, § 1; Shan., § 5772a1; Code 1932, § 9971; Acts 1972, ch. 612, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 29-107.

Law Reviews.

Equal Numbers Don't Add Up to Equal Opportunities for Many Women Lawyers, ABA Report Finds, 37 No. 7 Tenn. B.J. 17 (2001).

50 Years of Pioneers: Early Women in Tennessee Law (Suzanne Craig Robertson), 37 No. 7 Tenn. B.J. 14 (2001).

Collateral References. 7 Am. Jur. 2d Attorneys at Law § 8.

7 C.J.S. Attorney and Client § 7.

Attorney and client
1.

23-1-108. License and oath required.

No person shall practice law in this state without first receiving a license issued by the Tennessee supreme court and complying with Tennessee Supreme Court Rule 6 concerning admission to the practice of law, except that nothing in this section precludes the pro hac vice admission of persons licensed in other jurisdictions in accordance with Tennessee Supreme Court Rule 19.

Code 1858, § 3965 (deriv. Acts 1798, ch. 2, §§ 2, 3; 1809 (Sept.), ch. 6, § 1); Shan., § 5772; mod. Code 1932, § 9970; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 29-108; Acts 1987, ch. 328, § 1; 2009, ch. 485, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 345, § 1 provided that the supreme court be encouraged to study the feasibility of creating an inactive license category that allows attorneys to perform pro bono service only for those persons receiving service from organizations that have received a determination of exemption under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).. The inactive license category shall not authorize any other practice of law.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote the section which read: “No person shall practice law as an attorney, solicitor, or counselor in this state without a license issued by the supreme court of the state and without first having taken and subscribed to an oath in open court, or before a clerk of a court of record in unusual circumstances subject to the approval of the supreme court, to support the constitutions of the state of Tennessee and of the United States and to truly and honestly demean such person in the practice of the profession to the best of such person's skill and ability.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 485, § 2. June 23, 2009.

Cross-References. Admission of attorneys, Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 6.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney and Client, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Note, 16 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 531 (1986).

Cited: Bivins v. Hospital Corp. of Am., 910 S.W.2d 441, 1995 Tenn. App. LEXIS 421 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1995); Turtle Creek Apts. v. Polk, 958 S.W.2d 789, 1997 Tenn. App. LEXIS 430 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1997); B & G Constr. v. Polk, 37 S.W.3d 462, 2000 Tenn. App. LEXIS 249 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2000).

23-1-109. Party acting as own attorney.

Any person may conduct and manage the person's own case in any court of this state.

Code 1858, § 3979; Shan., § 5791; Code 1932, § 9982; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 29-109.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 146.

Attorney General Opinions. Interpleader actions by real estate brokers as unauthorized practice of law. OAG 14-08, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 8 (1/14/14).

Cited: Bivins v. Hospital Corp. of Am., 910 S.W.2d 441, 1995 Tenn. App. LEXIS 421 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1995); Turtle Creek Apts. v. Polk, 958 S.W.2d 789, 1997 Tenn. App. LEXIS 430 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1997); In re Estate of Jewell B. Green v. Carthage General Hosp., 246 S.W.3d 582, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 455 (Tenn. Ct. App. July 20, 2007).